Vermont, session 2025-2026, H168.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. PURPOSE; INTENT
(a) Purpose. The purpose of this act is to safeguard the academic freedom
of Vermont’s public educators in grades prekindergarten through grade 12,
inclusive, to provide instruction on topics related to social equity and justice, to
affirm and respect diverse identities, and to ensure that curriculum decisions
remain under the purview of Vermont’s public education authorities without
external influence.
(b) Intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly that nothing in this act
be construed to alter, amend, or conflict with existing educational standards
adopted by the State Board of Education, including the Common Core State
Standards and the Next Generation Science Standards, or impose additional
requirements on the development or implementation of curricula beyond those
contained in 16 V.S.A. §§ 164 and 165. It is not the intent of the General
Assembly to mandate or dictate specific curriculum or instructional materials.
It is the intent of the General Assembly for curriculum development and
implementation to remain the responsibility of supervisory unions within the
standards set by the State Board of Education. This act is intended solely to
safeguard academic freedom and ensure inclusive instruction on topics related
to social equity and justice.
VT LEG #379161 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.168
2025 Page 3 of 12
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 914 is added to read:
§ 914. PROHIBITION ON THE RESTRICTION OF INSTRUCTION ON
SOCIAL EQUITY AND JUSTICE
(a) Prohibition. The State Board of Education, supervisory union boards,
and school boards shall not prohibit public educators from providing
instruction on topics of social equity or social justice.
(b) Instruction.
(1) Instruction in public schools may include:
(A) historical systems of oppression and exclusion;
(B) the concept of race and gender as social constructs; and
(C) social identities and the intersection of power and privilege
within those identities.
(2) All public school curricula shall allow for a broad range of books,
literature, and media to support instruction on the topics contained in
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) No instructional tools or materials shall be removed from classrooms
without prior review by the State Board of Education. Library material
selection policies and procedures for the reconsideration and retention of
materials shall comply with section 1624 of this title.
VT LEG #379161 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.168
2025 Page 4 of 12
(4) Public educators shall not be prohibited from using a gender-
affirming approach in the educator’s instruction, including honoring students’
stated preferred names and pronouns.
(5) Educators shall have the right to integrate personal perspectives,
cultural identities, and lived experiences into their teaching methods, provided
they meet professional standards established by the Standards Board for
Professional Educators.
(6) Curriculum development and implementation shall remain the
responsibility of supervisory unions within the standards set by the State Board
of Education.
Sec. 3. 16 V.S.A. § 165 is amended to read:
§ 165. EDUCATION QUALITY STANDARDS; EQUAL EDUCATIONAL
OPPORTUNITIES; INDEPENDENT SCHOOL MEETING
EDUCATION QUALITY STANDARDS
(a) In order to carry out Vermont’s policy that all Vermont children will be
afforded educational opportunities that are substantially equal in quality, each
Vermont public school, including each career technical center, shall meet the
following education quality standards, which shall foster inclusivity and affirm
the diverse identities and lived experiences of educators and students:
* * *
VT LEG #379161 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.168
2025 Page 5 of 12
(3) The school substantially meets standards adopted by rule of the State
Board regarding conditions, practices, and resources of schools. The standards
shall prohibit the influence of privately funded or nongovernmental groups in
decisions regarding curriculum development, instructional materials, and
student preparation and shall address those aspects of the following that are
most closely associated with improving student performance:
(A) school leadership, staff, and support services;
(B) instructional practices and curriculum leadership, content, and
coordination, which shall require instruction on social equity and justice;
(C) educational materials and school facilities; and
(D) access to current technology.
* * *
(8) The school maintains a safe, orderly, civil, and positive learning
environment that is free from hazing, harassment, and bullying, and is based on
sound instructional and classroom management practices and clear discipline
policies that are consistently and effectively enforced. This shall include
adopting policies and practices that affirm the dignity of all educators and
students that foster mutual respect and recognize the intrinsic value of each
individual’s self-identified characteristics, cultural background, and lived
experiences, which implicitly encompasses the use of pronouns, respect of
individual identities, and the fostering of inclusive environments.
VT LEG #379161 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.168
2025 Page 6 of 12
* * *
Sec. 4. 16 V.S.A. § 164 is amended to read:
§ 164. STATE BOARD; GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES
The State Board shall engage local school board members and the broader
education community and, consistent with the provisions of this title, its own
rules, and rules adopted by the Secretary, establish and regularly update a long-
term strategic vision for the delivery of educational services in Vermont;
advise the General Assembly, the Governor, and the Secretary of Education on
high-priority educational policies and issues as they arise; and act in
accordance with legislative mandates, including the adoption of rules and
executing special assignments. In addition to other specified duties, the Board
shall:
* * *
(22) Adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to ensure the
professional autonomy of educators to teach in a manner reflecting their
identities and lived experiences.
Sec. 5. 16 V.S.A. § 261a is amended to read:
§ 261a. DUTIES OF SUPERVISORY UNION BOARD
(a) Duties. The board of each supervisory union shall:
VT LEG #379161 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.168
2025 Page 7 of 12
(1) Establish a supervisory union-wide curriculum, by either developing
the curriculum or assisting the member districts to develop it jointly, and
ensure implementation of the curriculum. The curriculum shall:
(A) meet the requirements adopted by the State Board under
subdivision 165(a)(3)(B) of this title; and
(B) include instruction on social equity and justice, addressing
historically marginalized groups, systems of oppression, and the social
constructs of race and gender.
(2) Assist each school in the supervisory union to follow the curriculum
as adopted under the requirements of the State Board pursuant to subdivision
165(a)(3)(B) of this title.
* * *
(18) Act independently of privately funded groups when developing
curricula and policies and prioritize the academic and social development of
students.
* * *
Sec. 6. 16 V.S.A. § 906 is amended to read:
§ 906. COURSE OF STUDY
(a) In public schools, approved and recognized independent schools, and in
home study programs, learning experiences shall be provided for students in
the minimum course of study.
VT LEG #379161 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.168
2025 Page 8 of 12
(b) For purposes of this title, the minimum course of study means learning
experiences adapted to a student’s age and ability in the fields of:
(1) basic communication skills, including reading, writing, and the use
of numbers;
(2) citizenship, history, and government in Vermont and the United
States;
(3) physical education and comprehensive health education, including
the effects of tobacco, alcoholic drinks, and drugs on the human system and on
society;
(4) English, American, and other literature;
(5) the natural sciences; and
(6) the fine arts; and
(7) social equity and justice, including both historical and contemporary
issues affecting marginalized groups.
Sec. 7. 16 V.S.A. chapter 42 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 42. STUDENT RIGHTS ACADEMIC FREEDOM
* * *
§ 1625. SUPPORT AND RESOURCES FOR PARENTS, GUARDIANS,
AND FAMILIES OF LESBIAN, GAY, BISEXUAL,
TRANSGENDER, QUEER, AND QUESTIONING STUDENTS
VT LEG #379161 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.168
2025 Page 9 of 12
(a) The Agency of Education shall develop resources, or, as appropriate,
update existing resources, for supports and community resources for the
support of parents, guardians, and families of lesbian, gay, bisexual,
transgender, queer or questioning, intersex, and asexual (LGBTQIA+)
students, as well as develop strategies to increase the support for LGBTQIA+
students and thereby improve overall school and community climate. The
resources shall be designed for use in public schools and approved independent
schools that serve students in grades seven to 12, inclusive. The Agency shall
collaborate with parents, guardians, and families in the development of such
resources and supports.
(b) The Agency shall periodically update the supports and community
resources developed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to ensure
compliance with changes in the law.
(c)(1) As used in this section, “school-based supports and community
resources for the support of parents, guardians, and families of LGBTQIA+
pupils” includes the following:
(A) parents, guardians, and families of LGBTQIA+ students support
groups or affinity clubs and organizations;
(B) safe spaces for parents, guardians, and families of LGBTQIA+
pupils;
VT LEG #379161 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.168
2025 Page 10 of 12
(C) antibullying and harassment policies and related complaint
procedures for parents, guardians, and families to access;
(D) counseling services;
(E) school staff who have received antibias or other training aimed at
supporting LGBTQIA+ youth and their parents, guardians, and families; and
(F) suicide prevention policies and related procedures for parents,
guardians, and families to access.
(2) As used in this section, “community resources for the support of
parents, guardians, and families of LGBTQIA+ pupils” includes the following:
(A) local community-based organizations that provide support to
parents, guardians, and families of LGBTQIA+ youth; and
(B) local physical and mental health providers with experience in
treating and supporting parents, families, and guardians of LGBTQIA+ youth.
§ 1626. STUDENT SUPPORT
(a) An employee or contractor of a school district, supervisory union, or
approved independent school shall not be required to disclose any information
related to a student’s sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression
to any other person without the student’s consent unless otherwise required by
State or federal law.
(b) An employee or contractor of a school district, supervisory union, or
approved independent school shall not enact or enforce any policy, rule, or
VT LEG #379161 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.168
2025 Page 11 of 12
administrative regulation that would require an employee or contractor to
disclose any information related to a student’s sexual orientation, gender
identity, or gender expression to any other person without the student’s consent
unless otherwise required by State or federal law.
(c) Any policy, regulation, guidance, directive, or other action of a school
district, supervisory union, or approved independent school that is inconsistent
with subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall be deemed invalid and shall
not have any force or effect.
§ 1627. EMPLOYEE PROTECTIONS
An employee or contractor of a school district, supervisory union, the
Agency of Education, State Board of Education, approved independent school,
or a member of a school district board, supervisory union board, or governing
body of an approved independent school shall not in any manner retaliate or
take adverse action against any employee, including by placing the employee
on administrative leave on the basis that the employee:
(1) supported a student in the exercise of the student’s rights under State
or federal law;
(2) performed the employee’s work activities in a manner consistent
with applicable State or federal law; or
VT LEG #379161 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.168
2025 Page 12 of 12
(3) provided instruction to students consistent with section 914 of this
title, current content standards, curriculum frameworks, and instructional
materials and any applicable State or federal law.
Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379161 v.2